Montana, session 2025, HB858.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 7, Chapter 433, Laws of 2009, is amended to read:
"Section 7. Termination. The amendment in [section 3(5)] defining "coal washing" and the
amendment in [section 3(6)] revising the definition of "contract sales price" terminate July 1, 2017 2027."

Section 2. Section 352, Chapter 1, Laws of 2015, is amended to read:
"Section 1. Termination. Section 7, Chapter 433, Laws of 2009, is amended to read:
"Section 7. Termination. The amendment in [section 3(5)] defining "coal washing" and the amendment
in [section 3(6)] revising the definition of "contract sales price" terminate July 1, 2017 2025 2027.""

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 858